Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,104
Partition; report of referees set aside, when; rereference.

On good cause shown, the report may be set aside and the matter again referred to the same or other referee or referees.

R.S.1867, Code § 837, p. 541;

R.S.1913, § 8320;

C.S.1922, § 9272;

C.S.1929, § 20-21,104;

R.S.1943, § 25-21,104.